District of Columbia statutes.
11-502

Criminal jurisdiction.

In addition to its jurisdiction as a United States district court and any other jurisdiction conferred on it by law, the United States District Court for the District of Columbia has jurisdiction of the following:

(1)

Any criminal case begun in the court by the return of an indictment or the filing of an information before the effective date of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970.

(2)

Any criminal case which is begun in the court by the return of an indictment or the filing of an information during the eighteen-month period beginning on such effective date and which —

(A)

involves a violation of any one of the following sections of the Act entitled “An Act to establish a code of law for the District of Columbia”, approved March 3, 1901:

(i)

section 809 (D.C. Official Code, sec. 22-101) [repealed] (relating to abortion),

(ii)

section 803 (D.C. Official Code, sec. 22-401) (relating to assault with intent to kill, rob, rape, or poison),

(iii)

section 823(a) (D.C. Code, sec. 22-801(a)) (relating to burglary in the first degree),

(iv)

section 812 (D.C. Official Code, sec. 22-2001) (relating to kidnaping),

(v)

sections 798 through 802 (D.C. Official Code, secs. 22-2101 through 22-2105) (relating to murder and manslaughter),

(vi)

section 808 (D.C. Official Code, sec. 22-4801 [repealed]) (relating to rape),

(vii)

section 810 (D.C. Official Code, sec. 22-2801) (relating to robbery); or

(B)

involves any other offense under any law applicable exclusively to the District of Columbia which offense is joined in such information or indictment with any of the offenses listed in subparagraph (A).

(3)

Any offense under any law applicable exclusively to the District of Columbia which offense is joined in the same information or indictment with any Federal offense.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 477, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-923 and § 23-311.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-502.
1973 Ed., § 11-502.

References in Text

“The effective date of the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970,” referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this section, means, as set forth in § 199(c) of the Act, the first day of the seventh calendar month which began after the enactment of the Act.